Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 17 Trustee Process

10-17-1.
“Trustee” defined.

The word “trustee”, wherever occurring in this chapter, shall be deemed to include the words “attorney”, “agent”, “factor”, or “debtor”.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 596; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-1

.

10-17-2.
Account by trustee as to attached property.

Whenever any person, partnership, or corporation shall be served with a judicial writ, original or mesne process, with purpose of attaching the wages or personal estate of the defendant in the hands or possession of the person, partnership, or corporation, the person, partnership, or corporation shall render an account in writing, upon oath, to the court to which the writ is returnable. The original account shall state what wages or personal estate, if any, up to the amount of the demands set forth in the writ, the trustee had in his, her, or its hands or possession at the time the writ was served, except as provided in §

6A-4-303

; or if none shall exist, the trustee shall state that fact in writing, to the court. The trustee is not required to account to the court for property in his, her, or its hands or possession in excess of the demand set forth in the writ.

Whenever a supplemental accounting is required by §

10-17-4

, the trustee shall set forth the amount of wages garnished, if any, in the reporting period and shall also state the total amount of defendant’s wages held by the trustee to date. Upon the entire amount of demand as set forth in the writ being collected, or if the defendant permanently leaves the trustee’s employment, final account shall be filed with the court issuing the writ, setting forth that fact.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 576; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 586, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1490, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 10; P.L. 1930, ch. 1608, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-2

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1984, ch. 357, § 3.

10-17-3.
Oath to account — Certified copy.

The disclosure made by virtue of §

10-17-2

shall be sworn to before any person authorized to administer oaths and shall be filed with the clerk of the court to which the writ shall be returnable, and if the name and address of plaintiff’s attorney appears on the writ, a copy of the disclosure shall be mailed to the attorney at that address. The party filing the disclosure shall be entitled, on tendering a copy thereof and a fee of twenty-five cents ($.25) to the clerk, to have the copy certified by the clerk with whom the original is filed, and a certificate indorsed on such copy of the fact and date of filing.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 577; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-3

; P.L. 1968, ch. 62, § 2.

10-17-4.
Time of filing account.

The account shall be filed with the court to which the writ is returnable within twenty (20) days after the service.

In the case of wage garnishments, supplementary accounts shall be filed monthly thereafter until one of three (3) events occurs:

The entire amount of plaintiff’s demand and costs of suit has been collected by the garnishee and reported to the court.

The defendant is no longer employed by the garnishee.

Plaintiff has released the garnishee from any obligation to file further accounts.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 576; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 586, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1490, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 10; P.L. 1930, ch. 1608, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 58; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 14; P.L. 1984, ch. 357, § 3.

10-17-5.
Surrender of property to officer.

When the personal estate of a defendant other than money or credits shall be attached in the hands of a person as trustee, if that person shall surrender the personal estate to the officer making the attachment, the officer shall take possession of the personal estate and make due return thereof upon the writ of attachment.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 576; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 586, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1490, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 10; P.L. 1930, ch. 1608, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-5

.

10-17-6.
Summons of garnishee as witness.

In any action where money or other property shall have been trusteed in the hands of a person, firm, or corporation, the person signing the garnishee’s answer may be summoned by either party at any time before final judgment and subjected to examination and cross-examination upon all matters relating to or connected with the facts set forth in the answer, and evidence may be introduced to contradict the testimony of that person.

A person summoned as provided in subsection (a) shall be entitled to an attendance fee of three dollars ($3.00) and lawful mileage, and unless summoned in the manner set forth in subsection (a), the answer sworn to by a trustee shall be deemed true in deciding how far the trustee is chargeable.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 578; P.L. 1907, ch. 1432, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-6

.

10-17-7.
Amount with which trustee charged — Action against trustee.

If the accounts filed by any trustee in accordance with §

10-17-2

shall disclose that the trustee is holding any wages or personal estate of the defendant, then the trustee shall be charged to the amount disclosed, if less than the judgment or decree, otherwise to the amount of the judgment or decree. At the discretion of the court, an order may be entered allowing a partial charge of those funds. However, no such order shall be entered in the same case more than once in a three (3) month period of time. The plaintiff, after having recovered judgment or decree against the defendant, may bring his or her action against the trustee to recover the amount for which he or she is charged, with interest and costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 579; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-7

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 58; P.L. 1984, ch. 357, § 3.

10-17-8.
Suits against separate trustees.

Whenever it shall appear that several persons, partnerships, or corporations have property of the defendant as trustees, the plaintiff may sue each separately and recover the amount in his or her hands, until the plaintiff shall receive full payment of his or her judgment or decree against the original defendant, with interest and costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 580; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-8

.

10-17-9.
Satisfaction by trustee after judgment against defendant.

Any trustee, after final judgment or decree against the defendant, may satisfy the judgment or decree, or any part thereof, to the amount of the estate attached in his or her hands, before any suit shall be brought against him or her therefor; and such payment shall avail for his or her discharge, as against both plaintiff and defendant, for the amount thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 581; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-9

.

10-17-10.
Delivery of specific articles on execution.

If it shall appear by the disclosure that the personal estate in the hands of the trustee belonging to the defendant did not consist of money, but of one or more specific articles, the trustee may, after final judgment or decree against the defendant, surrender or deliver to the officer charged with the execution issued on the judgment or decree, the specific articles, in order that they may be taken on execution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 582; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2025, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-10

.

10-17-11.
Delivery of money to court before judgment.

If it shall appear by the disclosure that the personal estate in the hands of the trustee belonging to the defendant consisted of money, the trustee, at any time before final judgment, may deliver the money to the clerk of the court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2025, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-11

.

10-17-12.
Discharge of trustee by surrender or delivery.

The surrender or delivery shall be a good discharge to the trustee for the articles or money, as to both plaintiff and defendant in the action.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 583; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2025, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-12

.

10-17-13.
Determination as to whether trustee is chargeable.

Whenever any person shall be served with a copy of a writ by which he or she shall be sought to be charged as trustee of the defendant named in the writ, and the person shall appear and answer to the action or suit so commenced, as to whether he or she is or is not a trustee of the defendant, the court in which the action or suit is brought or may be pending shall determine whether the person so served, is properly chargeable as the trustee of the defendant; and if chargeable, to what extent.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 584; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-13

.

10-17-14.
Liability of trustee for false answers.

Any person summoned as trustee of a defendant, making a false answer or affidavit in any case, shall be liable to the plaintiff in a civil action for any damages which may result to him or her from the false answer or affidavit.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 585; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-14

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 58.

10-17-15.
Liability on failure to render account — Action against trustee.

If any person, co-partnership or corporation, served as trustee with a copy of a writ, shall refuse or neglect to render, on oath, the account required by §

10-17-2

, of what personal estate of the defendant the trustee had in his or her hand at the time of the service of the copy, the trustee shall be charged to the amount of the judgment or decree, if any, rendered against the defendant in the suit; or, if no judgment is so rendered because of want of service upon the defendant, then, the trustee shall be charged to the amount of the just claim or demand which the plaintiff may show against the defendant to the satisfaction of the court. The amount for which the trustee is charged may be recovered by a civil action against him or her, except as otherwise provided in §

9-25-24

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 586; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 20; P.L. 1917, ch. 1490, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-15

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 58.

10-17-16.
Joint action against trustees failing to account.

If several trustees shall neglect or refuse to render an account upon oath in the same case, then the plaintiff shall bring his or her action against all the trustees jointly, and in no other manner.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 587; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-16

.

10-17-17.
Defense in name of defendant.

Every person, who shall be served with a copy of a writ against any defendant, may file an answer to the action or suit and defend the suit in behalf and in the name of the defendant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 588; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-17

.

10-17-18.
Dismissal of person served who holds no property.

If it shall appear by the disclosure that the person who or partnership or corporation which had been served as trustee with a copy of such writ, had not any of the personal estate of the defendant in his, her, or its hands, then the action or suit shall be dismissed, and the trustee who shall appear to defend the action shall recover the costs, unless the court has acquired personal jurisdiction over the defendant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 589; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-18

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 15.

10-17-19.
Intervention by other claimant of estate.

Whenever the personal estate of any defendant is attached on trustee process, any person claiming the personal estate, under an assignment or otherwise, may on his or her own motion become a party to the action or suit so far as respects the title to the personal estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 590; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-19

.

10-17-20.
Questions of fact on additional allegations.

Any question of fact arising upon additional allegations may be tried and determined in the manner that the court shall direct.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 592; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-20

.

10-17-21.
Apportionment of costs.

In all cases under this chapter, the costs may be apportioned as the court may determine.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 593; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-21

.

10-17-22.
Costs and charges incurred by trustee.

Every person, partnership, or corporation served with a copy of a writ for attaching the estate of another in his, her, or its hands or possession shall be paid all lawful costs and charges which he, she, or it shall incur in consequence of being served with the writ of attachment by the person who brings the action or suit; and so much of such charge as shall be judged reasonable by the court before whom the cause shall be pending shall be allowed in the bill of costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 595; G.L. 1909, ch. 301, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 351, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 550, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

10-17-22

.